Nebraska, session 109, LB940.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. (1) For purposes of this section:
(a) Color additive has the same meaning as in 21 U.S.C. 321, as such
section existed on January 1, 2026; and
(b) School meal means a school meal served pursuant to the federal Richard
B. Russell National School Lunch Act, 42 U.S.C. 1751 et seq., or the federal
Child Nutrition Act of 1966, 42 U.S.C. 1771 et seq., as such acts and sections
existed on January 1, 2026, and does not include any other food offered or made
available to students.
(2) On or after August 1, 2027, no public elementary or secondary school
shall offer or make available to any student any food served as a part of a
school meal that contains any of the following color additives as referred to
by the United States Food and Drug Administration in the federal Regulatory
Status of Color Additives as such list existed on January 1, 2026:
(a) Blue No. 1;
(b) Blue No. 2;
(c) Green No. 3;
(d) Red No. 40;
(e) Yellow No. 5; or
(f) Yellow No. 6.
-1-